non_repo/blackfoot_noun.lexc
! glosses based on Frantz 2017
Multichar_Symbols   1+ 2+ 3+ NAN NIN +1P +21 +2P +3S +3P +4S +4P +AN.P +IN.S +IN.P +NONPARTIC

LEXICON Root
0   PossessivePrefix ;
0   NounNotPossessedStem ;

LEXICON PossessivePrefix
1+:nit^      NounStem ;
1+:n^        NounStem ;
2+:kit^      NounStem ;
2+:k^        NounStem ;
21+:kit^     NounStem ;
21+:k^       NounStem ;
3+:ot^       NounStem ;
4+:ot^       NounStem ;

LEXICON NounStem
0   NAN ;
0   NIN ;
0   NIR ;
0   NAR ;

LEXICON NounNotPossessedStem
0   NAN ;
0   NIN ;

LEXICON PossessiveSuffix
0               Agr ;
+1P:^innaan     Agr ;
+21P:^innoon    Agr ;
+2P:^oaawa      Agr ;
+3P:^oaawa      Agr ;
+4S:^wa         Agr ;
+4P:^oaawa      Agr ;

LEXICON Agr
0   NANAgr ;
0   NINAgr ;

LEXICON NANAgr
+3S:^wa          # ;  ! animate singular suffix (major third person)
+AN.P:^iksi      # ;  ! animate plural suffix
+NONPARTIC:^yi   # ;  ! non-particular suffix, causes deletion of non-permanent consonants, IMPLEMENT
+4S:^yi          # ;  ! minor third person suffix, retains non-permanent consonants

LEXICON NINAgr
+IN.S:^yi        # ; ! inanimate singular suffix, retains non-permanent consonants
+IN.P:^istsi     # ; ! inanimate plural suffix

LEXICON NAN
natáyo      NANAgr ;
naató'si    NANAgr ;
ponoká      NANAgr ;
nínaa       NANAgr ;
kakkóó      NANAgr ;
mamíí       NANAgr ;
atapíím     NANAgr ;
póós        NANAgr ;

LEXICON NAR
iksisst     PossessiveSuffix ;
ohko        PossessiveSuffix ;
itan        PossessiveSuffix ;
i's         PossessiveSuffix ;
ookoowa     PossessiveSuffix ;
ota's       PossessiveSuffix ;

LEXICON NIN
í'ksisako   NINAgr ;    ! stems end in vowel
ápssi       NINAgr ;
ómahksíkimi NINAgr ;
ni'tómmo    NINAgr ;
ómahksíksko NINAgr ;
matsiní     NINAgr ;    ! stems end in accented vowel
pootsisí    NINAgr ;
aatakó      NINAgr ;
niiítahtaa  NINAgr ;    ! stems end in long vowel
sísstsiksii NINAgr ;
páyoo       NINAgr ;
aohkíí      NINAgr ;
paatáák     NINAgr ;    ! stems end in consonant
mo'tokáán   NINAgr ;
míín        NINAgr ;
iitáómio'p  NINAgr ;
soyópok     NINAgr ;
